District of Columbia statutes.
3-207

Bodies to be delivered at expense of receiving institutions.

Neither the United States nor the District of Columbia, nor any officer, agent, or servant thereof, shall be at any expense by reason of the delivery of any body or bodies aforesaid, except such as may be properly chargeable on account of bodies delivered to the medical schools of the Army, Air Force, and Navy, the medical examining boards of the Army, the Air Force, the Navy, and the Public Health Service, and the Commission on Licensure to the Practice of the Healing Art; but all expenses of such delivery and distribution, except as hereinbefore specified, and of said Anatomical Board, shall be paid by the schools receiving such bodies, in such manner as may be specified by said board and by such school in proportion to the number of bodies which it has received; and no school which has failed or refused to pay its just proportion of such expense as determined by said board shall be allowed to receive any body or bodies, or parts thereof, while the amount so due remains unpaid.

Apr. 29, 1902, 32 Stat. 175, ch. 638, § 7
Aug. 14, 1912, 37 Stat. 309, ch. 288
Feb. 27, 1929, 45 Stat. 1326, ch. 352
1981 Ed., § 2-1407.
1973 Ed., § 2-207.

All functions of the Public Health Service and of all officers and employees thereof and all functions of all agencies of or in the Public Health Service were transferred to Secretary of Health, Education, and Welfare by 1966 Reorganization Plan No. 3, 80 Stat. 1610. The functions of the Department of Health, Education, and Welfare were transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services by the Act of October 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 675, Pub. L. 96-88, § 509.

The functions of the Department of Licenses, Investigations and Inspections were transferred to the Director of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs by Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, effective March 31, 1983.

Commission on Licensure to Practice the Healing Art abolished: The Commission on Licensure to Practice the Healing Art in the District of Columbia was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. The functions were delegated to the Department of Occupations and Professions by Reorganization Order No. 59, dated June 30, 1953. Section 402(34) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 transferred the regulatory and other functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section, insofar as they relate to making and altering rules and altering and adopting a common seal, to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided by § 406 of the Plan. Section 401 of the Plan transferred all other functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The functions delegated to the Department of Occupations and Professions were subsequently transferred to the Director of the Department of Economic Development by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. The Department of Economic Development was replaced by Mayor’s Order 78-42, dated February 17, 1978, which Order established the Department of Licenses, Investigation and Inspections.

Anatomical Board abolished: See note to § 3-201.